Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.100

Violation of RCW 19.122.090—Affirmative defense.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5627-S.SL) ***

If charged with a violation of RCW 19.122.090, an equipment operator is deemed to have established an affirmative defense to such charges if:

(1) The equipment operator was provided a valid excavation confirmation code;

(2) The excavation was performed in an emergency situation;

(3) The equipment operator was provided a false confirmation code by an identifiable third party; or

(4) Notice of the excavation was not required under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 263 s 16; 2005 c 448 s 6.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.